Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Chapter 1. General Provisions.
§ 17.1-125.
Civil order book.

The clerk shall record (i) trust fund orders pursuant to §§

17.1-123

and

17.1-124

and (ii) the annual trust fund report required pursuant to subsection G of §

8.01-600

in a book known as the civil order book, in which shall be recorded all reports, orders, and decrees concerning moneys received or to be received by general receivers pursuant to §

8.01-582

and by clerks pursuant to §

8.01-600

.

History.

1988, c. 553, § 17-28.1; 1998, c. 872; 2017, c. 35.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 35 rewrote the section which formerly read: “There shall be kept in the office of the clerk of every circuit court an order book to be known as the trust fund order book, in which shall be recorded all reports, orders, and decrees concerning moneys received or to be received by general receivers pursuant to §

8.01-582

and by clerks pursuant to §

8.01-600

. Recording of orders and decrees pursuant to this section shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any recording otherwise required by statute.”

§§ 17.1-126,
17.1-127.
Repealed by Acts 2001, c. 836, cl. 2.

§ 17.1-128.
Recording evidence and incidents of trial in certain civil cases and cost thereof; cost of transcripts; preservation of original notes or records; certified transcript prima facie correct.

In all civil cases, the court or judge trying the case may by order entered of record provide for the recording verbatim of the evidence and incidents of trial either by a court reporter or by mechanical or electronic devices approved by the court. The expense of reporting and recording the trial of a civil case shall be paid by the litigants in the manner and in the proportion as the court may in its discretion direct. A transcript of the record, when required by any party, shall be paid for by such party. The court on appeal may provide that such cost may, in civil cases, be reimbursed to the party prevailing. The court shall not allow a defendant convicted of a crime from which the civil matter arose to recover such cost from the victim, as defined in §

19.2-11.01

, of such crime. The failure to secure the services of a reporter, or the failure to have the case reported or recorded for any other reason, shall not affect the proceeding or trial. The reporter or other individual designated to report and record the trial shall preserve the original shorthand notes or other original records for not less than five years. The transcript in any case certified by the reporter or other individual designated to report and record the trial shall be deemed prima facie a correct statement of the evidence and incidents of trial.

The administration of this section shall be under the direction of the Supreme Court of Virginia.

History.

1952, c. 642, § 17-30.1; 1956, c. 699; 1962, c. 419; 1964, c. 533; 1968, c. 358; 1975, c. 640; 1984, c. 752; 1994, c. 496; 1998, c. 872; 2022, c. 279.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 279, added the fifth sentence of the first paragraph.

Law Review.

For article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 183 (2010).

For Survey article, see “Civil Practice and Procedure,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2013).

For essay, see “Terminating Parental Rights through a Backdoor in the Virginia Code: Adoptions Under section

63.2-1202

(H),” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 371 (2013).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 8-203. Notice of Appeal; No. 8-213. Notice of Filing of Transcript; No. 8-227. Notarized Bill of Costs.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Costs, § 12.

§ 17.1-128.1.
Recording evidence and incidents of trial in certain misdemeanor cases.

In any misdemeanor case in circuit court for which no recording verbatim of the evidence and incidents of trial either by a court reporter or by mechanical or electronic devices approved by the court will be used, the court shall allow the defendant, the Commonwealth, or both to record the evidence and incidents of trial by mechanical or electronic device to aid counsel in producing a thorough, complete, and accurate written statement of facts in lieu of transcript for purposes of any appeal. The recording shall not be made a part of the record unless otherwise permitted.

History.

2014, c. 78.

§ 17.1-129.
Filing date and time to be noted on papers.

Whenever a pleading in any civil action is filed in a circuit court, the clerk or his designee shall stamp or mark the date and time of filing on the face of such pleading.

History.

1985, c. 369, § 17-30.3; 1998, c. 872.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Clerk must treat pleadings as filed when received without passing on their validity. —

Court’s mandamus ordered clerk to do ministerial act: to treat woman’s personal injury pleadings as received, filed, and on docket as of day they were presented to clerk (statute of limitation’s last day) even though caption named wrong court; the clerk had no authority to pass upon the validity of instruments presented for filing. Burkholder v. McGraw, 63 Va. Cir. 537, 2003 Va. Cir. LEXIS 360 (Roanoke County Dec. 31, 2003).

§ 17.1-130.
Execution of judgments and decrees of courts no longer existing.

Every judgment, decree or order entered in a court which has ceased to exist shall be executed by the court in the custody of whose clerk the record of such judgment, decree or order may be. Every judgment, decree or order of the Supreme Court effecting any judgment, decree or order shall be certified by the court and the case shall be proceeded in as if such court had rendered the same.

History.

Code 1919, § 5974, § 17-32; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-131.
Jurisdiction to issue writs of mandamus in matters pertaining to action of service district commission.

The circuit court of a county or city having original and general jurisdiction of civil actions in which county or city is situated the seat of government of a service district, shall have original exclusive jurisdiction to issue writs of mandamus in all matters or proceedings arising from or pertaining to the action of the service district commission.

History.

1968, c. 225, § 17-32.1; 1998, c. 872; 2005, c. 681.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-1201. Petition for Writ of Mandamus Against Officer of a Corporation; No. 6-1207. Petition for Writ of Mandamus Against Sheriff.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 681, effective January 1, 2006, substituted “civil actions” for “suits in chancery and civil cases at law.”

§ 17.1-132.
Courts Technology Fund.

There is hereby established the Courts Technology Fund as a special nonreverting fund to be administered by the Supreme Court of Virginia. A portion of the sums collected pursuant to §§ 16.1-69.48:2,

17.1-275

,

17.1-328

, and

17.1-418

as specified in each section shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the Fund.

The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. Any funds remaining in the Fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the general fund, but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on the Fund shall be credited to the Fund. Except for transfers pursuant to this section, there shall be no transfers out of the Fund, including transfers to the general fund.

Money in the Fund shall be allocated at the direction of the Supreme Court of Virginia to staff, advance, update, maintain, replace, repair, and support the telecommunications and technology systems of the judicial system. The revenue raised in support of the Fund shall not be used to supplant current funding to the judicial branch.

History.

2006, cc. 623, 718.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 39 G, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “In addition to any filing fee or other fee permitted by law, an electronic access fee may be charged for each case filed electronically pursuant to Rule 1:17 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia. The amount of this fee shall be set by the Supreme Court of Virginia. Moneys collected pursuant to this fee shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the Courts Technology Fund established pursuant to §

17.1-132

, to be used to support the costs of statewide electronic filing systems.”